Virginia statutes. Title 44. Military and Emergency Laws.
Chapter 5. Mobilization of Fire Fighters.

§ 44-152.
Outside service by fire departments.

Whenever a state of war exists between the United States and any foreign country and at the request of the chief executive of any county, city or town in this Commonwealth the head of any other fire department may, or if so ordered by the Governor shall, detail, assign and make available for duty and use in such county, town or city any part of the officers, fire fighters, forces, fire-fighting apparatus or other equipment under his command or control.

History.

1942, p. 369; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(137); 1977, c. 326.

§ 44-153.
Powers, duties, rights, privileges and immunities.

Whenever all or any part of the regular fire-fighting forces of any county, town or city in this Commonwealth are engaged in rendering services pursuant to this chapter, the officers and members of such fire-fighting forces shall have the same powers, duties, rights, privileges and immunities as if they were performing their duties in the political subdivision in which they are normally employed.

History.

1942, p. 369; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(138).

§ 44-154.
Loss, damages, expense or cost.

The county, town or city in which any equipment is used pursuant to this chapter shall be liable for any loss or damage thereto and to the supplies therefor and shall pay any expenses incurred in the operation and maintenance thereof, including the cost of all materials and supplies therefor. No claim for any such loss, damage, expense or cost shall be allowed unless, within sixty days after the same has been sustained or incurred, a written notice of such claim, under oath and itemizing the same, is served by mail or otherwise upon the treasurer of such county, town or city where such equipment was so used.

History.

1942, p. 369; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(139).

§ 44-155.
Liability for acts or omissions.

Neither the Commonwealth nor the political subdivision of the Commonwealth whose fire-fighting forces are engaged pursuant to this chapter shall be liable or accountable in any way for or on account of any act or omission on the part of an officer or member of such forces while engaged pursuant to this chapter or for or on account of the operation, maintenance or use of any apparatus, equipment or supplies in connection therewith, nor shall any fire commissioner, fire chief or other superior officer or head of a fire department, fire company or other fire-fighting forces, acting pursuant to this chapter, be held liable or accountable in any way for or on account of any act or omission on the part of any of his subordinates without the political subdivision of their appointment while such subordinates are under the command of an officer other than himself.

History.

1942, p. 369; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(140).

§ 44-156.
Reimbursement for salaries and expenses.

The political subdivision in which aid or assistance is given pursuant to this chapter shall reimburse the political subdivision furnishing such aid and assistance for any moneys paid for the salaries or other compensation of employees furnished under this chapter during the time they shall not be performing their duties in the political subdivision by which they are employed or act and shall defray the actual traveling and maintenance expenses of such employees while they are rendering such aid and assistance. The provisions of this section and the term “employee” as used herein shall mean and apply with equal effect to paid and volunteer fire fighters.

History.

1942, p. 370; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(141); 1977, c. 326.

§ 44-157.
Temporary substitute fire-fighting forces.

Whenever all or any part of the regular fire-fighting forces of any county, city or town in the Commonwealth are engaged in rendering aid and assistance, pursuant to this chapter, substitute fire fighters, not exceeding the number of regular fire fighters engaged in rendering such aid and assistance, may be appointed in the same manner as provided by law for the appointment of such regular fire fighters. Except in the case of a volunteer fire company, the compensation of such substitute fire fighters shall be fixed at a sum not greater than the lowest rate of pay for a regular fire fighter in such fire department, company or fire-fighting force. Each person appointed under this section shall be vested with the same powers and charged with the same duties as if he were a regular member of such fire department, company or fire-fighting force. No appointment under this section shall continue for more than two days after the regular fire fighters for whom they are substituting have returned to duty. The compensation of any substitute fire fighter appointed pursuant to this section and any allowable expense actually and necessarily incurred by him in the performance of his duties shall be charged against the county, city or town in and for which he was appointed and shall be audited and allowed in the same manner as other charges against the county, city or town are audited and allowed.

History.

1942, p. 370; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(142); 1977, c. 326.

§ 44-158.
Rules and regulations.

The Governor is hereby authorized and empowered to prescribe all necessary and reasonable rules and regulations in order to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History.

1942, p. 370; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(143).

§ 44-159.
When chapter in effect.

This chapter shall be in effect only during the time a state of war exists between the United States and any foreign country.

History.

1942, p. 370; Michie Code 1942, § 2673(144).